dev/infreq-apertium-nn-nb.nn.dix
    <!-- Determiners -->
    <pardef n="ei/n__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


  <!-- desse; desse -->
    <pardef n="desse__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- såvoren; såvor -->
    <pardef n="såvor/en__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>en<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>en<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>en<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>en<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>en<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
          <r>en<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- sånn; sån -->
    <pardef n="sån/n__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- dette; dette -->
    <pardef n="dette__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- det; det -->
    <pardef n="det__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- slik; slik -->
    <pardef n="slik__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- dilik; dilik -->
    <pardef n="dilik__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- annan; an -->
    <pardef n="an/nen__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dre</l>
          <r>nan<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dre</l>
          <r>nan<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r>nan<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nan</l>
          <r>nan<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r>nan<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- dei; dei -->
    <pardef n="dei__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- denne; denne -->
    <pardef n="denne__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- den; den -->
    <pardef n="den__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- hin; hi -->
    <pardef n="hi/n__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tt</l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- sovoren; sovor -->
    <pardef n="sovor/en__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>en<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>en<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>en<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>en<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>en<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
          <r>en<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="al/l__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>l</l>
          <r>l<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>l<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
          <r>l<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="fiskeh/ank__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anka</l>
          <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>anki</l>
          <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ank</l>
          <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enkene</l>
          <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enker</l>
          <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="CGS-systemet__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="vidjehank"><i>vidjeh</i><par n="fiskeh/ank__n"/></e>
    <e lm="CGS-systemet"><i>CGS-systemet</i><par n="CGS-systemet__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fiskehank"><i>fiskeh</i><par n="fiskeh/ank__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nyklehank"><i>nykleh</i><par n="fiskeh/ank__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nykelhank"><i>nykelh</i><par n="fiskeh/ank__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nøklehank"><i>nøkleh</i><par n="fiskeh/ank__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nøkkelhank"><i>nøkkelh</i><par n="fiskeh/ank__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lyklehank"><i>lykleh</i><par n="fiskeh/ank__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lykelhank"><i>lykelh</i><par n="fiskeh/ank__n"/></e>
